Mississippi, session 2026, HB1435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The following words shall have the following meanings described herein: (a)  "Law enforcement officer" means the same as defined in Section 45-6-3, and includes any other person who has the authority of law to stop or otherwise detain a person if the failure or refusal of the person to stop or be detained could result in criminal penalties to the person. (b)  "Stop" means any hinderance of a person's movement, interruption of movement or form of detention by a law enforcement officer for any reason including consensual or nonconsensual searches of the person's body or property in the person's possession or control. (2)  When a law enforcement officer stops any person for any reason, such law enforcement officer or officers, as applicable, shall articulate the reason or reasons for such stop during the time of the stop. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.